Nevada, session 83, AB462.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 277B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. “Industrial park” means land, including, without
limitation, all necessary rights, appurtenances, easements and
franchises relating to such land, that is acquired and developed by
a participating entity or authority for the establishment and
location of a series of sites for plants and other buildings for
industrial, distribution and wholesale use.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2. The term includes, without limitation, the acquisition and
provision of water, sewage, drainage, street, road, sidewalk, curb,
gutter, street lighting, electrical distribution, railroad or docking
facilities, to the extent such facilities are incidental to the use of
the land as an industrial park.
Sec. 3. “Municipality” means any county or city in this State.
Sec. 4. “Undertaking” means any enterprise to acquire,
improve or equip, or any combination thereof, in the case of a
county or incorporated city with respect to any tax increment area
created by an ordinance adopted pursuant to section 5 of this act:
1. A drainage and flood control project, as defined in
NRS 244A.027;
2. An overpass project, as defined in NRS 244A.037;
3. A sewerage project, as defined in NRS 244A.0505;
4. A street project, as defined in NRS 244A.053;
5. An underpass project, as defined in NRS 244A.055;
6. A water project, as defined in NRS 244A.056;
7. A rail project, as defined in NRS 278C.105;
8. An airport project; or
9. A utility project.
Sec. 5. 1. If an inland port or industrial park is created by
one participating entity, the participating entity, on behalf of the
county or incorporated city in which the inland port or industrial
park is located, may adopt an ordinance creating a tax increment
area within the inland port or industrial park consisting of all or
any portion of the inland port or industrial park for the purpose of
creating a special account for the payment of bonds or securities
issued or loans, money advanced or indebtedness incurred to
defray the costs of an undertaking, as supplemented by the Local
Government Securities Law.
2. If an inland port or industrial park is created by two or
more participating entities, the participating entities may enter
into an interlocal or cooperative agreement for the ordering of an
undertaking whose boundaries encompass all or part of the inland
port or industrial park and the creation of a tax increment area
and the tax increment account pertaining thereto. A tax increment
area created pursuant to this subsection must be administered as
provided in the interlocal or cooperative agreement,
notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary. If
the participating entities enter into an interlocal or cooperative
agreement pursuant to this subsection, the participating entities
may, in accordance with the procedures set forth in the interlocal
or cooperative agreement:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(a) Jointly take any action required to be taken by a
participating entity for the creation of a tax increment area
pursuant to this section, except that each participating entity must
adopt an ordinance in order to create the tax increment area;
(b) Enter into contracts for the undertaking; and
(c) Issue bonds or otherwise finance the cost of the
undertaking.
3. A participating entity may amend an ordinance creating a
tax increment area pursuant to this section by adopting a
supplemental ordinance to:
(a) Modify the undertaking by specifying new undertakings or
removing or modifying undertakings specified in the original
ordinance.
(b) Add areas to or remove areas from a tax increment area.
 The amount of taxes to be allocated to a tax increment account
pursuant to subsection 5 must be computed separately for the
original tax increment area and each addition of land thereto.
4. A participating entity shall not adopt an ordinance creating
a tax increment area pursuant to this section unless:
(a) The board has determined that the undertaking described
in the ordinance is necessary or desirable to further the purposes
of the inland port or industrial park.
(b) The participating entity makes a finding at a public
hearing that the undertaking will benefit the inland port or
industrial park.
5. After the effective date of the ordinance adopted pursuant
to subsection 1, any taxes levied upon taxable property in the tax
increment area each year by or for the benefit of the State, the
municipality and any public body must be divided as follows:
(a) That portion of the taxes that would be produced by the
rate upon which the tax is levied each year by or for each of those
taxing agencies upon the total sum of the assessed value of the
taxable property in the tax increment area as shown upon the last
equalized assessment roll used in connection with the taxation of
the property by the taxing agency, must be allocated to, and when
collected must be paid into, the funds of the respective taxing
agencies as taxes by or for the taxing agencies on all other
property are paid.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the portion of
the taxes levied each year in excess of the amount determined
pursuant to paragraph (a) must be allocated to, and when
collected must be paid into, the tax increment account pertaining
to the undertaking to pay the bond requirements of loans, money
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
advanced to, or indebtedness, whether funded, refunded, assumed
or otherwise, incurred by the municipality to finance or refinance,
in whole or in part, the undertaking. Unless the total assessed
valuation of the taxable property in the tax increment area exceeds
the total assessed value of the taxable property in the tax
increment area as shown by the last equalized assessment roll
referred to in this subsection, all of the taxes levied and collected
upon the taxable property in the tax increment area must be paid
into the funds of the respective taxing agencies. When the loans,
advances and indebtedness, if any, and interest thereon, have been
paid, all money thereafter received from taxes upon the taxable
property in the tax increment area must be paid into the funds of
the respective taxing agencies as taxes on all other property are
paid.
6. The portion of the taxes levied each year in excess of the
amount determined pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 5
which is attributable to any tax rate levied by a taxing agency:
(a) To produce revenue in an amount sufficient to make
annual repayments of the principal of, and the interest on, any
bonded indebtedness that was approved by a majority of the
registered voters within the area of the taxing agency voting upon
the question, must be allocated to, and when collected must be
paid into, the debt service fund of that taxing agency.
(b) In excess of any tax rate of that taxing agency applicable to
the last taxation of the property before the effective date of the
ordinance, if that additional rate was approved by a majority of the
registered voters within the area of the taxing agency voting upon
the question, must be allocated to, and when collected must be
paid into, the appropriate fund of that taxing agency.
(c) Pursuant to NRS 387.3285 or 387.3287, if that rate was
approved by a majority of the registered voters within the area of
the taxing agency voting upon the question, must be allocated to,
and when collected must be paid into, the appropriate fund of the
taxing agency.
(d) For the support of the public schools within a county
school district pursuant to NRS 387.195, must be allocated to, and
when collected must be paid into, the State Education Fund.
7. The provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection 6 include,
without limitation, a tax rate approved for bonds of a county
school district issued pursuant to NRS 350.020, including, without
limitation, amounts necessary for a reserve account in the debt
service fund.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
8. A tax increment area must expire not more than 30 years
after the date on which the ordinance which creates the area
becomes effective.
9. As used in this section, the term “last equalized assessment
roll” means the assessment roll in existence on the 15th day of
March immediately preceding the effective date of the ordinance.
Sec. 5.5. The provisions of NRS 338.013 to 338.090,
inclusive, apply to any construction work to be performed under
any contract or other agreement related to any undertaking
pursuant to this chapter. With respect to the undertaking, the
participating entity, the owner of any property within a tax
increment area created pursuant to this chapter, the developer,
any contractor who is awarded the contract or enters into the
agreement to perform the construction work and any
subcontractor who performs any portion of the construction work
related to such an undertaking shall comply with the provisions of
NRS 338.013 to 338.090, inclusive, in the same manner as if the
participating entity had undertaken the undertaking or had
awarded the contract.
Sec. 6. The allowed revenue from taxes ad valorem
determined pursuant to NRS 354.59811 does not apply to a tax
increment area created pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 7. 1. To defray in whole or in part the cost of any
undertaking, a participating entity may issue the following
securities:
(a) Notes;
(b) Warrants;
(c) Interim debentures;
(d) Bonds; and
(e) Temporary bonds.
2. Any net revenues derived from the operation of an
undertaking supported by the issuance of securities pursuant to
this section must be pledged for the payment of the securities. The
securities must be made payable from any such net pledged
revenues as the bond requirements become due from time to time
by the bond ordinance, trust indenture or other proceedings that
authorize the issuance of the securities or otherwise pertain to
their issuance.
3. Securities issued pursuant to this section:
(a) Must be made payable from tax proceeds accounted for in
the tax increment account maintained by the participating entity
pursuant to section 5 of this act; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(b) May, at the option of the participating entity and if
otherwise so authorized by law, be made payable from the taxes
levied by the participating entity against all taxable property
within the boundaries of the participating entity.
 A participating entity may also issue general obligation
securities other than the ones authorized by this chapter that are
made payable from taxes without also making the securities
payable from any net pledged revenues or tax proceeds accounted
for in the tax increment account maintained by the participating
entity pursuant to section 5 of this act.
4. Any securities payable only in the manner provided in
either paragraph (a) of subsection 3 or in both subsection 2 and
paragraph (a) of subsection 3:
(a) Are special obligations of the participating entity and are
not in their issuance subject to any debt limitation imposed by law;
(b) While they are outstanding, do not exhaust the debt
incurring power of the participating entity; and
(c) May be issued under the provisions of the Local
Government Securities Law without any compliance with the
provisions of NRS 350.020 to 350.070, inclusive, except as
otherwise provided in the Local Government Securities Law, only
after the issuance of municipal bonds is approved under the
provisions of NRS 350.011 to 350.0165, inclusive.
5. Any securities payable from taxes in the manner provided
in paragraph (b) of subsection 3, regardless of whether they are
also payable in the manner provided in paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 or in both subsection 2 and paragraph (a) of
subsection 3:
(a) Are general obligations of the participating entity and are
in their issuance subject to such debt limitation;
(b) While they are outstanding, do exhaust the power of the
participating entity to incur debt; and
(c) May be issued under the provisions of the Local
Government Securities Law only after the issuance of municipal
bonds is approved under the provisions of:
(1) NRS 350.011 to 350.0165, inclusive; or
(2) NRS 350.020 to 350.070, inclusive,
 except for the issuance of notes or warrants under the Local
Government Securities Law that are payable out of the revenues
for the current year and are not to be funded with the proceeds of
interim debentures or bonds in the absence of such bond approval
under the two acts designated in subparagraphs (1) and (2).
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
Sec. 8. NRS 277B.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277B.010 This chapter may be known and cited as the Inland
Port and Industrial Park Authority Act.
Sec. 9. NRS 277B.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277B.020 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 277B.030 to
277B.070, inclusive, and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 10. NRS 277B.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277B.030 “Authority” means an inland port authority or
industrial park authority created pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 11. NRS 277B.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277B.150 1. Subject to the requirements set forth in NRS
277B.150 to 277B.180, inclusive, an inland port or industrial park
may be created only in a contiguous area that:
(a) Includes at least two of the following:
(1) A municipally owned airport with a runway of at least
[4,500] 5,001 feet.
(2) A portion of a highway that is part of the National
Highway System.
(3) Operating assets of at least one Class I railroad as
classified by the Surface Transportation Board.
(b) Does not include any residential property.
(c) In the case of an industrial park, may include property
adjacent to the industrial park but may only include property that
includes or is adjacent to an inland port.
2. All areas within the boundaries of an inland port or
industrial park must be within the boundaries of the county or
counties and incorporated city or cities, as applicable, of the one or
more participating entities which apply to the Office pursuant to
NRS 277B.160 for the creation of the inland port [.] or industrial
park.
3. If the boundaries of an inland port or industrial park will
include a municipally owned airport as described in subparagraph
(1) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1:
(a) The municipality that owns and operates the airport must be
a participating entity; or
(b) If the municipality that owns and operates the airport is not a
participating entity, the municipality, by ordinance, must approve of
the inclusion of the airport within the boundaries of the inland port
[.] or industrial park.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
Sec. 12. NRS 277B.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277B.160 1. One or more participating entities may apply to
the Office to create, operate and maintain an inland port or
industrial park and authority. In a county whose population is
700,000 or more, only the board of county commissioners of the
county may apply to the Office to create, operate and maintain an
inland port or industrial park and authority within the boundaries
of the county, including the boundaries of any incorporated city
within the county.
2. A participating entity is eligible to apply to the Office
pursuant to subsection 1 if the county or incorporated city, as
applicable, of the participating entity is located in whole or in part
within the proposed boundaries of the inland port [.] or industrial
park.
3. The Office may [approve] :
(a) Approve the creation of an inland port or industrial park and
authority if the Office determines that the proposed inland port or
industrial park and authority will serve the economic interests of
this State.
(b) With the approval of the Board of Economic Development
created by NRS 231.033, initiate the creation of an inland port or
industrial park, as applicable, and authority.
Sec. 13. NRS 277B.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277B.170 1. If the Office approves the creation of an inland
port or industrial park and authority pursuant to NRS 277B.160,
each participating entity shall hold at least two public hearings to
discuss the creation of the inland port or industrial park and
authority.
2. The participating entity shall give notice of the hearing by
publication in a newspaper published in the county not later than 7
days before the hearing. The notice must include, without limitation:
(a) The date, time and place for the hearing;
(b) The boundaries of the proposed inland port [,] or industrial
park, including, without limitation, a map of the proposed inland
port [;] or industrial park; and
(c) The powers of the proposed authority.
Sec. 14. NRS 277B.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277B.180 If a participating entity obtains approval of the
Office for the creation of an inland port or industrial park and
authority pursuant to NRS 277B.160, the participating entity shall
create the inland port or industrial park and authority by ordinance.
The ordinance must include, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
1. A description of the boundaries of the inland port [;] or
industrial park;
2. The location of the principal office of the authority;
3. The name of the inland port or industrial park and
authority; and
4. The number of directors who will compose the board of the
authority pursuant to NRS 277B.200.
Sec. 15. NRS 277B.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277B.190 1. If a participating entity wishes to withdraw from
an authority with regard to which there is more than one
participating entity, the participating entity shall:
(a) Adopt an ordinance providing for the withdrawal;
(b) Obtain approval from the board; and
(c) Give notice to the other participating entity or entities of its
intent to withdraw,
 at least 6 months before the date on which the withdrawal would
be effective.
2. Upon the withdrawal of a participating entity from the
authority pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) The boundaries of the inland port or industrial park must be
adjusted by the other participating entity or entities to comply with
the provisions of NRS 277B.150; or
(b) The authority must be dissolved pursuant to subsection 3 as
soon as practicable.
3. An authority is dissolved if:
(a) The dissolution is approved by the board;
(b) Each participating entity agrees to the dissolution;
(c) All debts and other liabilities of the authority have been paid
or discharged, or adequate provision has been made for the payment
of all debts and other liabilities;
(d) There are no suits pending against the authority, or adequate
provision has been made for the satisfaction of any judgment, order
or decree that may be entered against the authority in any pending
suit; and
(e) The authority has a commitment from another governmental
entity to assume jurisdiction of all property of the authority.
Sec. 16. NRS 277B.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277B.200 1. An authority must be governed by a board of
directors with an odd-numbered membership set by the participating
entity or entities. If there is more than one participating entity, the
membership of the board of directors must be agreed to by all of the
participating entities. The board of directors must be composed of:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(a) One director appointed by each county that is a participating
entity, if any;
(b) One director appointed by each city that is a participating
entity, if any;
(c) One director appointed by the Governor, if none of the
participating entities is an incorporated city;
(d) If the authority includes a municipally owned airport
described in subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 277B.150, one director appointed by:
(1) In a county whose population is 700,000 or more, the
department of aviation of the county; or
(2) In a county whose population is less than 700,000, the
governing body of the airport authority, if any, and if there is not an
airport authority, by the governing body of the municipality which
owns the airport; and
[(d)] (e) Any other directors appointed in accordance with this
section and as provided in an ordinance adopted by a participating
entity pursuant to NRS 277B.180.
2. A director must reside within the boundaries of the
participating entity that appoints him or her.
3. The following persons are not eligible to be appointed to a
board:
(a) An elected official of any governmental entity.
(b) An employee of a participating entity.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the directors
described in subsection 1 must be appointed to terms of 4 years. The
terms must be staggered in such a manner that, to the extent
possible, the terms of one-half of the directors will expire every 2
years. The initial directors of the authority shall, at the first meeting
of the board after their appointment, draw lots to determine which
directors will initially serve terms of 2 years and which will serve
terms of 4 years. A director may be reappointed.
5. A vacancy occurring during the term of a director must be
filled by the appointing participating entity for the unexpired term as
soon as is reasonably practicable.
Sec. 17. NRS 277B.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277B.320 1. The governing body of an authority shall adopt
bylaws for the governance of the authority, and shall not impose
any fees unless at least two-thirds of the members of the governing
body approve the imposition of the fee.
2. An authority may enter into an agreement that provides for
the lease of rights-of-way, the granting of easements or the issuance
of franchises, concessions, licenses or permits.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
[2.] 3. Except as otherwise provided in subsections [3,] 4 , 5
and [5,] 6, with the consent of any county, city or other
governmental entity, an authority may:
(a) Use streets, alleys, roads, highways and other public ways of
the county, city or other governmental entity; and
(b) Relocate, raise, reroute, change the grade of or alter, at the
expense of the authority:
(1) A street, alley, highway, road or railroad;
(2) Electric lines and facilities;
(3) Telegraph and telephone properties and facilities;
(4) Pipelines and facilities;
(5) Conduits and facilities; and
(6) Other property,
 as necessary or useful in the construction, reconstruction, repair,
maintenance and operation of the inland port [.] or industrial park,
as applicable.
[3.] 4. An authority may not alter:
(a) A highway that is part of the state highway system without
the consent of the Department of Transportation.
(b) A railroad without the consent of the railroad company.
(c) A municipally owned airport.
[4.] 5. If an inland port or industrial park includes a
municipally owned airport:
(a) An authority may not interfere with or exercise any control
over commercial air transportation operations or airlines that operate
at the airport; and
(b) The airport authority, department of aviation or other
existing governing body that owns or manages the airport retains
such ownership or management control.
[5.] 6. Nothing in this section authorizes an authority to
perform any action in violation of any requirement of federal law or
condition to the receipt of federal money.
Sec. 18. NRS 277B.340 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277B.340 An authority may market, advertise and promote the
use of the inland port or industrial park that the authority
constructs, owns, operates, regulates or maintains.
Sec. 19. NRS 226.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
226.420 1. The State Treasurer , in coordination with the
Department of Education, shall establish by regulation a program
to provide reimbursement for tuition charges, registration fees,
laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees paid to an institution
within the Nevada System of Higher Education by a person who:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(a) [Completed a] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
4, has completed a Teacher Academy College Pathway Program
offered pursuant to NRS 388.223; [and]
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, has worked as
a full-time, licensed teacher at a public school in this State for at
least 3 consecutive school years ;
(c) Has completed the Free Application for Federal Student
Aid provided for by 20 U.S.C. § 1090; and
(d) Has successfully completed a program at an institution
within the Nevada System of Higher Education for the
preparation of a person to become a licensed teacher.
2. The program may not provide reimbursement for any tuition
charge, registration fee, laboratory fee or any other mandatory fee
which was paid or otherwise provided for through a scholarship,
financial aid, waiver or similar financial assistance. For the
purposes of this subsection, a student education loan, as defined in
NRS 226.510, must not be considered financial aid or financial
assistance.
3. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
State Treasurer may provide partial reimbursement of tuition
charges, registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory
fees paid by a person who [completed a Teacher Academy College
Pathway Program offered pursuant to NRS 388.223] satisfies the
criteria set forth in paragraphs (a), (c) and (d) of subsection 1 and
who has worked as a full-time, licensed teacher at a public school in
this State for 1 year or 2 consecutive years in an amount not to
exceed, for each year of service at a public school in this State, one-
third of the total tuition charges, registration fees, laboratory fees
and any other mandatory fees paid by the person to an institution
within the Nevada System of Higher Education which are subject to
reimbursement pursuant to this section and the regulations adopted
pursuant thereto.
4. If a person has not completed a Teacher Academy College
Pathway Program offered pursuant to NRS 388.223 because of
circumstances beyond the control of that person, including,
without limitation, because the person attended a high school that
did not offer a Program, but the person satisfies the criteria set
forth in paragraph (c) and (d) of subsection 1, the State Treasurer
may, upon the submission of an application by that person,
provide:
(a) Reimbursement for tuition charges, registration fees,
laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees paid to an institution
within the Nevada System of Higher Education by the person if
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
the person has worked as a full-time, licensed teacher at a public
school in this State for at least 3 consecutive years.
(b) Partial reimbursement for tuition charges, registration
fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees paid to an
institution within the Nevada System of Higher Education, in the
amount described in subsection 3, if the person has worked as a
full-time, licensed teacher at a public school in this State for 1
year or 2 consecutive years.
Sec. 20. NRS 354.59811 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
354.59811 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 244.377,
278C.260, 354.59813, 354.59815, 354.59818, 354.5982, 354.5987,
354.705, 354.723, 450.425, 450.760, 540A.265 and 543.600, and
section 6 of this act, for each fiscal year beginning on or after
July 1, 1989, the maximum amount of money that a local
government, except a school district, a district to provide a
telephone number for emergencies or a redevelopment agency, may
receive from taxes ad valorem, other than those attributable to the
net proceeds of minerals or those levied for the payment of bonded
indebtedness and interest thereon incurred as general long-term debt
of the issuer, or for the payment of obligations issued to pay the cost
of a water project pursuant to NRS 349.950, or for the payment of
obligations under a capital lease executed before April 30, 1981,
must be calculated as follows:
(a) The rate must be set so that when applied to the current fiscal
year’s assessed valuation of all property which was on the preceding
fiscal year’s assessment roll, together with the assessed valuation of
property on the central assessment roll which was allocated to the
local government, but excluding any assessed valuation attributable
to the net proceeds of minerals, assessed valuation attributable to a
redevelopment area and assessed valuation of a fire protection
district attributable to real property which is transferred from private
ownership to public ownership for the purpose of conservation, it
will produce 106 percent of the maximum revenue allowable from
taxes ad valorem for the preceding fiscal year, except that the rate so
determined must not be less than the rate allowed for the previous
fiscal year, except for any decrease attributable to the imposition of
a tax pursuant to NRS 354.59813 in the previous year.
(b) This rate must then be applied to the total assessed valuation,
excluding the assessed valuation attributable to the net proceeds of
minerals and the assessed valuation of a fire protection district
attributable to real property which is transferred from private
ownership to public ownership for the purpose of conservation, but
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
including new real property, possessory interests and mobile homes,
for the current fiscal year to determine the allowed revenue from
taxes ad valorem for the local government.
2. As used in this section, “general long-term debt” does not
include debt created for medium-term obligations pursuant to NRS
350.087 to 350.095, inclusive.
Sec. 21. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 22, 23 and 24 of this act.
Sec. 22. 1. A school district shall designate a teacher or
other licensed educational personnel, including, without
limitation, a school counselor, employed at each high school
which offers a career pathways program to coordinate the career
pathways programs at the high school.
2. As used in this section, “career pathways program” means:
(a) A Teacher Academy College Pathway Program offered
pursuant to NRS 388.223;
(b) A career pathway offered as part of the Career Pathways
Demonstration Program pursuant to NRS 232.985; or
(c) A program for work-based learning opportunities provided
pursuant to NRS 232.990.
Sec. 23. 1. There is hereby created within the Department
the Career Pathways Oversight Committee consisting of the
following members:
(a) The Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of
Workforce Innovation, or his or her designee;
(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, or his or her
designee;
(c) The superintendent of schools of each school district that is
required to establish a Teacher Academy College Pathway
Program pursuant to NRS 388.223, or his or her designee; and
(d) The following three members appointed by the Governor:
(1) One member who is a teacher at a public school who is
assigned to implement and teach a Teacher Academy College
Pathway Program offered pursuant to NRS 388.223, nominated by
the employee organization representing the plurality of teachers
employed by a large school district;
(2) One member who is a teacher at a public school who is
assigned to implement and teach a Teacher Academy College
Pathway Program offered pursuant to NRS 388.223, nominated by
the employee organization representing the plurality of teachers
employed by school districts in this State that are required to
establish a Teacher Academy College Pathway Program pursuant
to NRS 388.223, other than a large school district;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
(3) One member who is an administrator of a public school
in a school district that is required to establish a Teacher Academy
College Pathway Program pursuant to NRS 388.223, nominated
by the Nevada Association of School Superintendents; and
(4) One member who represents the Nevada System of
Higher Education, nominated by the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada.
2. The Committee shall:
(a) Establish metrics to measure the short- and long-term
success of the career pathways programs.
(b) Evaluate the progress and success of the career pathways
programs.
(c) Evaluate programs for dual credit provided by institutions
within the Nevada System of Higher Education.
(d) Report the results of the evaluations conducted pursuant to
paragraphs (b) and (c) to the State Board and the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education on or before June 1 of each
year.
(e) Identify the agency of this State with jurisdiction and
expertise necessary to assist in the oversight and implementation
of a career pathways program. An agency of this State identified
pursuant to this paragraph shall oversee, implement and regulate
the career pathways program.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall appoint an
employee of the Department to act as the Career Pathways
Oversight Coordinator, who shall:
(a) Provide technical support to assist in the implementation of
career pathways programs.
(b) Assist in coordinating the efforts of entities involved in the
implementation of career pathways programs, including, without
limitation, the Department, school districts, the Nevada System of
Higher Education, institutions within the System and the
Governor’s Office of Workforce Innovation.
4. As used in this section, “career pathways program” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 22 of this act.
Sec. 24. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 25. NRS 388.223 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.223 1. [Each] Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 2, each large school district shall offer a Teacher
Academy College Pathway Program at every high school in the
school district with 250 or more pupils enrolled that will enable
interested pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, to prepare for
employment in professions in K-12 education. A large school
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
district may offer a Program at high schools with fewer than 250
pupils. A school district that is not a large school district may offer a
Program at one or more high schools in the school district.
2. A large school district is not required to offer a Program at
a specialty school.
3. A large school district, and a school district that is not a
large school district which elects to offer the Program, shall:
(a) Advertise the Program and the benefits of participation in the
Program.
(b) Ensure that at least one licensed teacher is assigned full-
time to implement and teach the Program at each high school in
the school district which offers such a Program [is staffed by a full-
time employee who is:
(1) A licensed teacher or administrator; and
(2) Responsible for implementing the Program at the school.]
and at which more than two class periods of the Program are
offered, except that such a teacher may also serve as the person
designated pursuant to section 22 of this act to coordinate the
career pathways programs at the high school.
(c) Assess each pupil entering grade 9 who is or will be enrolled
in a high school which offers such a Program and who is interested
in participating in the Program, identify any barriers, including,
without limitation, academic, financial, socioeconomic and
transportation barriers, to the participation in and completion of the
Program by such interested pupils and, if such barriers are
identified, inform the pupil and the parents or legal guardian of the
pupil of any programs and services which are available to help the
pupil to overcome such barriers and provide such programs and
services to the pupil.
(d) Offer internships at elementary, junior high or middle
schools in the school district to qualified pupils in grades 11 and 12
who participate in the Program.
(e) Offer employment as a paraprofessional to qualified high
school graduates who have completed the Program and are enrolled
in a program to become a teacher at an institution in the Nevada
System of Higher Education.
(f) For qualified applicants for employment with the school
district who have completed the Program and who have submitted a
timely application, provide an offer of employment or decline to
provide an offer of employment to such an applicant not later than
January 31 of the year immediately preceding the school year for
which the applicant applied for employment.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
(g) Enter into an agreement with the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada to:
(1) Enable pupils who participate in the Program to earn up
to 12 units of college credit for courses taken and internships
engaged in as part of the Program and, to the extent that money is
available, the provision of such courses and internships at no cost
or reduced cost to the pupil.
(2) Establish qualifications for teachers of the school district
who teach courses in the Program which are eligible for college
credit, which may include, without limitation, a minimum of 4 years
of classroom teaching experience or a Master’s degree.
(3) Guarantee the admission of otherwise academically
qualified pupils who complete the Program to institutions in the
Nevada System of Higher Education.
(4) Provide programs, services, scholarships and financial aid
to assist pupils who participate in the Program in applying for
admission to institutions in the Nevada System of Higher Education
and completing the Program at such an institution.
(h) Offer dual credit courses at each high school in the school
district which offers the Program:
(1) In subjects which align with the requirements for
obtaining a bachelor’s degree in education; and
(2) In sufficient quantity that a pupil may obtain at least 12
units of college credit through the Program.
(i) Inform pupils who participate in the Program and the parents
and legal guardians of such pupils about programs, services,
scholarships and financial aid which are available to assist pupils in
applying for admission to institutions in the Nevada System of
Higher Education and completing the Program at such an institution.
[3.] 4. A school district may apply to the State Board for an
exemption from the provisions of paragraph (d) or (h) of
subsection 3 with respect to a high school which is not located in
an incorporated city if the school district can demonstrate that the
location of the high school makes compliance with those
provisions impracticable.
5. A large school district, and a school district that is not a
large school district which elects to offer the Program, may enter
into an agreement with the Board of Regents of the University of
Nevada to provide a faculty mentor from the Nevada System of
Higher Education to teachers of the school district who teach
courses in the Program to ensure such courses align with the
contents and rigor of equivalent courses taught at institutions within
the Nevada System of Higher Education. If the provisions of this
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
subsection conflict with the provisions of chapter 388G of NRS, the
provisions of this subsection prevail.
[4.] 6. To complete the Program a pupil must:
(a) Successfully complete at least 2 academic years in a
program of career and technical education established pursuant to
NRS 388.380 in the area of teaching or in approved dual credit
courses in the area of teaching; and
(b) Participate in at least 15 hours of paid or unpaid work-
based learning which is relevant to the field of teaching and may
include, without limitation, an internship offered pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 3 or a work-based learning
opportunity provided pursuant to NRS 232.990.
7. The State Board:
(a) Shall adopt regulations that prescribe the curriculum for the
Program which are consistent with the provisions of this section. To
the extent a school district provides programs of career and
technical education other than the Program, such programs of career
and technical education must nonetheless be consistent with the
regulations adopted pursuant to this paragraph, to the extent
applicable.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as are necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section.
[5.] 8. A pupil who is enrolled in a high school within a
school district, or a parent or legal guardian of such a pupil, who
is aggrieved by a final decision regarding the implementation of
the Program made by an administrator of the high school or the
board of trustees may, within 30 days after the decision is
rendered, make a written request to the board of trustees for a
hearing for reconsideration of the decision. The board shall
schedule the hearing within 30 days after receiving the request.
The decision of the board of trustees after its reconsideration
hearing is a final decision subject to judicial review as provided by
law.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Large school district” means any school district in this State
which has more than 100,000 pupils enrolled in its public schools.
(b) “Program” means the Teacher Academy College Pathway
Program created pursuant to this section.
(c) “Specialty school” means a public school that operates as a
magnet school or program, a school or program for career and
technical education, a school or program for special education or
an alternative program of education.
Secs. 26 and 27. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
Sec. 28. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 29. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 30. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)